North Carolina, session 2025, HB3.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. CABARRUS COUNTY BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS VACANCIES
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 153A-27.1(h), as amended by S.L. 2025-3, reads as rewritten:
"(h) This section shall apply only in the following counties: Alamance, Alexander,
Alleghany, Avery, Beaufort, Brunswick, Buncombe, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Caswell,
Cherokee, Clay, Cleveland, Cumberland, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Guilford,
Harnett, Haywood, Henderson, Hyde, Jackson, Lee, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, McDowell,
Mecklenburg, Moore, Onslow, Pender, Polk, Randolph, Rockingham, Rutherford, Sampson,
Stanly, Stokes, Transylvania, and Yancey."
SECTION 1.(b) This section applies to Cabarrus County only.
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
vacancies filled on or after that date.
PART II. BOARDS OF EDUCATION – PARTISAN ELECTIONS
CURRITUCK COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
SECTION 2.(a) Section 1 of Chapter 96 of the 1963 Session Laws reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. (a) The Board of Education of Currituck County shall consist of five members to
be elected by the electors of said county as hereinafter set out.serve staggered four-year terms.
(b) At the general election to be held in said county in 1964, there shall be elected one
Four members of the Board of Education of Currituck County shall be elected from residency
districts and one member shall be elected from the county at-large. For the four residency
districts, no person shall be eligible to file for or be elected to the board of education unless the
person is a qualified voter and resident of the residency district in which the candidate seeks to
be elected. One member of the Board of Education of Currituck County shall be elected from
each of the following residency districts:
(1) Moyock Township and Township.
(2) one member from Fruitful Township who shall serve for terms of four (4)
years each. Fruitville Township.
*H3-v-6*

(3) At said election there shall be elected one member of the Board from Poplar
Branch and one member from Township Township.
(4) Crawford Township who shall serve for terms of two (2) years each. At said
election there shall be elected one member of the board from the county at
large who shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Thereafter, as the terms of
office of the members expire, their successors shall be elected and shall serve
for terms of four (4) years each and until their successors are elected and
qualified.Township.
At all elections held for election of members of the board of education of said county, the
candidates shall be elected by the voters of the county voting as a whole.
(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-37, members of the Board of Education of Currituck
County shall be elected on a partisan basis at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year as terms expire. Candidates for election to the Board of Education of
Currituck County shall be nominated at the same time and in the same manner as other county
officers. Members shall take office on the first Monday in December following their election.
Members shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. Except as otherwise
provided, elections shall be conducted in accordance with Chapters 115C and 163 of the General
Statutes.
(d) All vacancies on the membership of the Board of Education of Currituck County by
death, resignation, or other causes shall be filled in accordance with G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 2.(b) This section does not affect the terms of office of any person elected
in 2024 to the Board of Education of Currituck County. Any vacancy on the Board of Education
of Currituck County for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining
members of the Board of Education of Currituck County to serve the remainder of the unexpired
term. Each member of the Board of Education of Currituck County elected in 2024, or any
member appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2024, shall serve until a successor
has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-37.1(d), as amended by S.L. 2025-3, reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Hickory City Board of Education and the
Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following counties: Alexander, Alleghany,
Ashe, Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Catawba, Cherokee, Clay,
Craven, Currituck, Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Lee,
Lincoln, Madison, McDowell, Mitchell, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Polk, Rowan,
Rutherford, Stanly, Stokes, Surry, Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
SECTION 2.(d) The question of changing the method of election for the members
of the Board of Education of Currituck County shall be submitted to the qualified voters of
Currituck County at the general election to be held on November 3, 2026, which election shall
be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that time. The question to be
used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Changing the method of election for the members of the Board of Education of
Currituck County from nonpartisan to partisan."
SECTION 2.(e) The Currituck County Board of Elections shall certify the results of
the referendum conducted under subsection (d) of this section. If the certification from the
Currituck County Board of Elections reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in
favor of the referendum set out in subsection (d) of this section, subsections (a) through (c) of
this section become effective the first Monday in December 2028, and in order to implement
subsections (a) through (c) of this section, the 2028 elections shall be conducted as if the
provisions of this section were already in effect.
SECTION 2.(f) Except as otherwise provided, this section is effective when it
becomes law.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-13 House Bill 3

PITT COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
SECTION 2.1.(a) Section 1 of Chapter 193 of the 1987 Session Laws, as amended
by S.L. 2013-318, reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. Beginning in December 2014, the The Pitt County Board of Education shall
consist of nine members. Nine members shall be elected from single-member districts, as
described in Section 5. Only voters residing in the district may vote for the member from that
district."
SECTION 2.1.(b) Section 4 of Chapter 193 of the 1987 Session Laws, as amended
by S.L. 2013-318, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. Elections shall be held on a partisan basis in even-numbered years as terms expire,
at the time of the regular election of general election. Candidates for election to the Pitt County
Board of Education shall be nominated at the same time and manner as other county officers.
Members shall take office at the time set by general State law on the first Monday in December
following the election and shall serve for staggered terms of four years. Members shall serve
until a successor has been elected and qualified. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall
be conducted in accordance with Chapters 115C and 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2.1.(c) Section 6 of Chapter 193 of the 1987 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 6. Vacancies on the Pitt County Board of Education shall be filled by appointment by
the remaining members of the Board. The person appointed shall serve until the next regularly
scheduled election for county boards of education, at which time a person shall be elected to fill
the remainder of the unexpired term or, if the term is due to expire that year, a new term. The
person appointed to fill a vacancy must reside in the same district as the departing member.in
accordance with G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 2.1.(d) This section does not affect the term of office of any member
elected in 2024 to the Pitt County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Pitt County Board of
Education for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members
of the Pitt County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. Each member
of the Pitt County Board of Education elected in 2024, or any member appointed to fill a vacancy
in 2024, shall serve until a successor has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 2.1.(e) G.S. 115C-37.1(d), as amended by S.L. 2025-3, reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Hickory City Board of Education and the
Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following counties: Alleghany, Ashe,
Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Catawba, Cherokee, Clay, Craven,
Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Lee, Lincoln, Madison,
McDowell, Mitchell, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Pitt, Polk, Rutherford, Stanly,
Stokes, Surry, Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
SECTION 2.1.(f) This section becomes effective the first Monday in December
2026. In order to implement this section, the 2026 elections shall be conducted as if the provisions
of this section were already in effect.
PART III. PAMLICO COUNTY MUNICIPALITIES – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR
ELECTIONS
TOWN OF ALLIANCE
SECTION 3.(a) Section 8 of the Charter of the Town of Alliance, being Chapter 760
of the 1965 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 8. Mayor and Mayor Pro Tem. At its organizational meeting on the first Saturday in
July, 1967, and biennially thereafter following a each regular municipal election, the board of
commissioners shall elect the town commissioner with the largest vote at said election, as
House Bill 3 Session Law 2025-13 Page 3

chairman, chair, who shall act as mayor, and another of its members its vice chairman, chair, who
shall act as mayor pro tempore. The mayor shall preside at meetings of the governing board, and
shall exercise such other powers and perform such other duties as are or may be conferred and
imposed upon him or her by the general laws of North Carolina, by this Charter, and by the
ordinances of the town. He The mayor shall be recognized as the head of the town government,
for all ceremonial purposes, by the courts for the service of all legal process in civil matters, and
by the Governor for the purposes of civil defense and military law. In time of public danger or
emergency the mayor shall, if so authorized and directed by the town governing board, take and
exercise command of the town police, maintain order, and enforce the law. In case of the absence
or other disability of the mayor to act, the mayor pro tempore shall act as mayor during the
continuance of the absence or other disability."
SECTION 3.(b) Section 14 of the Charter of the Town of Alliance, being Chapter
760 of the 1965 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 14. Municipal Elections. The regular election of members of the board of
commissioners shall be held on the last Saturday in June in the odd-numbered years, beginning
with the last Saturday in June, 1967, and biennially thereafter. The board of commissioners may,
for any other lawful purpose, and by resolution, order a special election, fix the time for holding
the same, and provide all other details and means for holding such special election.at the time of
the general election in each even-numbered year. The board of commissioners shall be elected
on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 3.(c) Section 15 of the Charter of the Town of Alliance, being Chapter
760 of the 1965 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 15. Regulations of Elections. All elections shall be conducted in accordance with the
general uniform municipal laws relating to municipal elections, in Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes, except as otherwise provided herein."
SECTION 3.(d) Sections 16, 17, 18, and 19 of the Charter of the Town of Alliance,
being Chapter 760 of the 1965 Session Laws, are repealed.
SECTION 3.(e) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Alliance
in 2025. The terms of office of the five members of the board of commissioners serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be extended by one year.
Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Alliance in even-numbered years
beginning in 2026.
TOWN OF ARAPAHOE
SECTION 3.1.(a) Notwithstanding the Charter of the Town of Arapahoe, being the
Charter approved by the Municipal Board of Control and filed with the Secretary of State on
September 21, 1920, as reactivated by Chapter 200 of the 1969 Session Laws, regular municipal
elections for officers in the Town of Arapahoe shall be held at the time of the general election in
each even-numbered year. The election shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and
the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the
election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter
163 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 3.1.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Arapahoe in 2025. The terms of office for the mayor and five commissioners in the Town of
Arapahoe serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall
be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Arapahoe in even-numbered years beginning in 2026.
TOWN OF BAYBORO
SECTION 3.2.(a) Section 2 of the Charter of the Town of Bayboro, being Chapter
110 of the Private Laws of 1903, reads as rewritten:
Page 4 Session Law 2025-13 House Bill 3

"SEC. 2. That there shall be held on the first Tuesday in May,1903, an election for mayor
The governing body for the Town of Bayboro shall consist of a Mayor and three five Town
Commissioners, and biennially thereafter on the first Tuesday in May an election shall be held
for the purpose of electing a Mayor and three Commissioners for said town. That the elected for
staggered four-year terms. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general
election in each even-numbered year. The Mayor and Town Commissioners of said town shall
hold a meeting on the first Wednesday in each month for the purpose of transacting the business
of said town. That all be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in
accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, municipal elections shall be held
under the provisions of the general election law, except as herein amended, except that the Board
of Town Commissioners shall appoint all registrar of elections for said town elections and all
poll holders, and shall canvass all the votes cast at each election and issue certificates of election
to the successful candidates, and in case of a tie in the vote of any two or more candidates they
may decide by a majority vote of said board in favor of either and declare the results of all
elections; and for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section the Board of Town
Commissioners shall on the first Wednesday in April, 1903, and biennially thereafter on the
first Wednesday in April, and appoint a registrar and two poll holders to hold said election, and
the registrar shall be required to keep open the registration book for registration of voters for ten
days only, being the ten days next preceding the day of election, Sundays excluded.conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.2.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Bayboro in 2025. The terms of office for the Mayor and two Commissioners in the Town of
Bayboro serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall
be extended by one year. The terms of office for the three Commissioners in the Town of Bayboro
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Bayboro shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2026 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF GRANTSBORO
SECTION 3.3.(a) Sections 3-3 and 3-4 of the Charter of the Town of Grantsboro,
being S.L. 1997-446, as amended by S.L. 2011-83, read as rewritten:
"Section 3-3. Term of Office of Council Members. Members of the Council are elected to
four-year terms in 2011 and quadrennially thereafter.terms.
"Section 3-4. Mayor; Term of Office. The Mayor shall be elected by the qualified voters of
the Town in 2011 and quadrennially thereafter for a four-year term."
SECTION 3.3.(b) Section 4-1 of the Charter of the Town of Grantsboro, being S.L.
1997-446, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4-1. Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general
election in each even-numbered year. Council members for the Town of Grantsboro shall be
elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in accordance with
G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with
the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.3.(c) Section 4-2 of the Charter of the Town of Grantsboro, being S.L.
1997-446, is repealed.
SECTION 3.3.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Grantsboro in 2027. The terms of office for the Council members and Mayor in the Town of
Grantsboro serving on the effective date of this section shall be extended by one year. Regular
municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Grantsboro in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028.
House Bill 3 Session Law 2025-13 Page 5

TOWN OF MESIC
SECTION 3.4.(a) Section 3.4 of the Charter of the Town of Mesic, being Chapter
626 of the 1971 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Section 3.4. Terms; Qualifications; Vacancies.
(a) Except for the terms of office as specified in Section 3.1. and Section 4.1. herein, the
Mayor and the members of the Town Board shall serve for terms of two (2) years, beginning the
day and hour of the organizational meeting following their election, as established by ordinance
in accordance with this Charter; provided, they shall serve until their successors are elected and
qualify.
(b) No person shall be eligible to be a candidate or be elected as a member of the Town
Board, or to serve in such capacity, unless he or she is a resident and a qualified voter of the
Town.
(c) If any elected Commissioner shall refuse to qualify, or if there shall be any vacancy
in the office of Commissioner after election and qualification, the remaining members of the
Board shall by majority vote appoint some qualified person to serve for the unexpired term. Any
Commissioner so appointed shall have the same authority and powers as if regularly elected."
SECTION 3.4.(b) Section 4.1 of the Charter of the Town of Mesic, being Chapter
626 of the 1971 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held on the
Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each odd-numbered year, beginning in 1973. In the
regular election in 1973 and biennially thereafter, there shall be elected five (5) Commissioners.
In the regular election in 1973 and biennially thereafter, there shall be elected a Mayor for a term
of two (2) years.at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The Mayor and
the Commissioners shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in
accordance with G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 3.4.(c) Section 4.2 of the Charter of the Town of Mesic, being Chapter
626 of the 1971 Session Laws, is repealed.
SECTION 3.4.(d) Section 4.3 of the Charter of the Town of Mesic, being Chapter
626 of the 1971 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.3. Regulation of Elections. All municipal elections shall be conducted in
accordance with the general uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina relating to
municipal elections, in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, except as otherwise provided herein."
SECTION 3.4.(e) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Mesic
in 2025. The terms of office of the Mayor and the five Commissioners serving on the effective
date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be extended by one year. Regular
municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Mesic in each even-numbered year
beginning in 2026.
TOWN OF MINNESOTT BEACH
SECTION 3.5.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Minnesott Beach, being
Chapter 890 of the 1971 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. The governing body of said Town shall consist of a mayor and four commissioners
who shall be elected at the time and in the manner provided in the General
Statutes.commissioners. The mayor and four commissioners shall be elected to serve two-year
terms. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. The mayor and commissioners shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality
basis and the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided,
the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter
163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.5.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Minnesott Beach in 2025. The terms of office of the mayor and the four commissioners serving
Page 6 Session Law 2025-13 House Bill 3

on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be extended by
one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Minnesott Beach in
each even-numbered year beginning in 2026.
TOWN OF ORIENTAL
SECTION 3.6.(a) Notwithstanding the Charter of the Town of Oriental, being
Chapter 184 of the Private Laws of 1899, as amended by Chapter 878 of the 1991 Session Laws,
Chapter 4 of the 1993 Session Laws, and Town Resolution 2024-12, regular municipal elections
for officers in the Town of Oriental shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. The election shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the
results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the election
shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the
General Statutes.
SECTION 3.6.(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a regular
municipal election shall be conducted in the Town of Oriental in 2025. The mayor and five
commissioners elected in the 2025 regular municipal election shall serve for a one-year term.
Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Oriental in each even-numbered
year beginning in 2026.
TOWN OF STONEWALL
SECTION 3.7.(a) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Stonewall, being Chapter
385 of the 1969 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. The governing body of said Town shall consist of a mayor and three commissioners
who shall be elected at the time and in the manner provided in Chapter 160 commissioners, each
elected to serve two-year terms. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the
general election in each even-numbered year. The mayor and commissioners shall be elected on
a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except
as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.7.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Stonewall in 2025. The terms of office for the mayor and three commissioners in the Town of
Stonewall serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall
be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Stonewall in each even-numbered year beginning in 2026.
TOWN OF VANDEMERE
SECTION 3.8.(a) Notwithstanding the Charter of the Town of Vandemere, being
Chapter 311 of the Private Laws of 1895, regular municipal elections for officers in the Town of
Vandemere shall be held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The
election shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in
accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 3.8.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Vandemere in 2025. The terms of office for the mayor and five commissioners in the Town of
Vandemere serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025
shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Vandemere in each even-numbered year beginning in 2026.
SECTION 3.9. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections
held on or after that date.
PART IV. VILLAGE OF SIMPSON – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS
House Bill 3 Session Law 2025-13 Page 7

SECTION 4.(a) Sections 4.1 and 4.2 of the Charter of the Village of Simpson, being
that Charter approved by the Municipal Board of Control and filed with the Secretary of State on
April 7, 1975, as amended by Ordinance No. 09-O-01 of the Village of Simpson, adopted on July
20, 2009, read as rewritten:
"Section 4.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held on
the Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year, beginning in 1975.
In the regular election of 1975, there shall be elected three (3) members of the Council. Beginning
in the regular election in 1975, and in subsequent elections all terms shall be for two (2) years.at
the time of the general election in each even-numbered year.
"Section 4.2. Regulation of Elections. All Except as otherwise provided, all municipal
elections shall be conducted by the Pitt County Board of Elections in accordance with the general
laws of North Carolina related to municipal elections, except as otherwise herein provided. the
uniform municipal election laws of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The municipal elections
shall be non-partisan and decided by a simple plurality. No primary election shall be
held.conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in accordance with
G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 4.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Village of
Simpson in 2025. The terms of office for the Mayor and the three members of the Village Council
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Village of Simpson
in each even-numbered year beginning in 2026.
SECTION 4.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
elections held on or after that date.
PART V. CITY OF MONROE – ELECTIONS
SECTION 5.(a) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the City of Monroe, being S.L.
2000-35, as amended by Ordinance Number 2016-11 adopted on May 3, 2016, reads as rewritten:
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held in each
odd-numbered year in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North
Carolina.even-numbered year. Elections shall be conducted on a nonpartisan basis and the results
determined using the nonpartisan plurality method as provided in G.S. 163-292.partisan basis.
Except as otherwise provided, the primary and election shall be held and conducted in accordance
with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county officers. Notwithstanding
Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, the Union County Board of Elections may set
the date and time completed petitions must be timely submitted for verification."
SECTION 5.(b) This section shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for
the city officers of the City of Monroe for a seat elected prior to the effective date of this section.
SECTION 5.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Monroe in
2025. The terms of office for the Mayor and three Council Members in the City of Monroe
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for the three Council Members in the City of Monroe
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Monroe shall resume in even-
numbered years beginning in 2026 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were
conducted in the odd-numbered years.
SECTION 5.(d) Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective at the time of the
organizational meeting held in accordance with G.S. 160A-68 in December 2026. In order to
implement subsection (a) of this section, the 2026 elections shall be conducted as if the provisions
of subsection (a) of this section were already in effect. Subsection (c) of this section is effective
when it becomes law and applies to elections held on or after that date.
Page 8 Session Law 2025-13 House Bill 3

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 25th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
House Bill 3 Session Law 2025-13 Page 9